Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-4,130.05
Driver safety courses; rules and regulations; fee.

The Department of Motor Vehicles shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations for the approval and administration of driver safety courses. No driver safety course shall be approved until a certificate is obtained from the department. The certificate shall be valid for two years after the date of issuance. Each original and renewal certificate application for a driver safety course shall be accompanied by a one-hundred-dollar fee. The fee shall be collected by the department and remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Department of Motor Vehicles Cash Fund.

Laws 1998, LB 320, § 16.